Utah statutes.
53A-3-402.1.   Access to student records by custodial and noncustodial
parents.
(1)  Except as provided in Subsection (2), a public school shall allow a
custodial parent and a noncustodial parent of a child the same access to their
child's education records.
(2)  A school may not allow a noncustodial parent access to the child's
education records if:
(a)  a court has issued an order that limits the noncustodial parent's access
to the child's education records; and
(b)  the school has received a copy of the court order or has actual knowledge
of the court order.
